Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-1318
Person claiming interest in property delivered to state; claim; filing; directed to nonprofit organization, when.

(1) Any person claiming an interest in any property delivered to the state under section 24-345 and the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act may file a claim thereto or to the proceeds from the sale thereof on the form prescribed by the State Treasurer.

(2) As directed by the claimant, the State Treasurer or his or her designee shall pay over or deliver any property, proceeds, and other sums payable to the claimant, to a nonprofit organization nominated by the State Treasurer.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 18, p. 2489;

Laws 1980, LB 572, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB532, § 6.